Utah statutes.
31A-22-1306.   Transition provision for existing policy forms.

Insurance policy forms need not conform to the requirements of this chapter until July 1, 1987.  However, insurance policies issued after July 1, 1986, are subject to Section 31A-21-107.



Amended by Chapter 204, 1986 General Session

